Wisconsin, session 2025, AB140.
do enact as follows:AB140,14Section 1. 66.1105 (17) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB140,2,2566.1105 (17) (h) City of Port Washington exception. The 12 percent limit 1described under sub. (4) (gm) 4. c. does not apply to the creation of Tax Incremental 2District Number 5 by the common council of the city of Port Washington.AB140,2,33